Virginia statutes. Title 47.1. Notaries and Out-of-State Commissioners.
Chapter 2. Appointment.

§ 47.1-3.
Power of appointment.

The Governor may appoint in and for the Commonwealth as many notaries as to him shall seem proper. Any person who acts as a notary in the Commonwealth shall register with and be commissioned by the Secretary of the Commonwealth and otherwise be in compliance with the provisions of this title.

History.

Code 1950, § 47-2; 1962, p. 287; 1972, c. 824; 1976, c. 559; 1979, c. 14; 1980, c. 580; 2007, cc. 269, 590.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 269 and 590 are identical and inserted the second sentence.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Notary Public, § 2.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Electronic notarization. —

Prior to July 1, 2008, an electronic notarization of a document by a Virginia notary public constituted a valid notarial act so long as the act was performed by a valid and commissioned notary public who complied with applicable laws and regulations. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John T. Frey, Clerk of the Circuit Court for Fairfax County, 08-089, 2009 Va. AG LEXIS 8 (2/2/09).

§ 47.1-4.
Qualification for appointment.

To be qualified to be commissioned as a notary in the Commonwealth, each such person (i) shall be at least 18 years of age, (ii) shall be a legal resident of the United States, (iii) shall be able to read and write the English language, (iv) shall never have been convicted of a felony under the laws of the United States, the Commonwealth, or any other state, unless such person has been pardoned for such felony, has had his conviction vacated by the granting of a writ of actual innocence, or has had his rights restored, and (v) shall otherwise be in compliance with the provisions of this title. A nonresident of Virginia may register and be commissioned as a notary only if he is regularly employed in the Commonwealth and meets all of the requirements of this section. A member of the armed services of the United States shall be eligible to register and be commissioned as a notary notwithstanding the provisions of §

2.2-2800

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 47-2, 47-3; 1972, c. 824; 1976, c. 559; 1979, c. 14; 1980, c. 580; 1983, c. 435; 1986, c. 561; 1989, c. 163; 2007, cc. 269, 590; 2013, c. 86.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 269 and 590 are nearly identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 86, in the first sentence, deleted “shall be” preceding “(i),” inserted “shall be” following the clause designators (i), (ii) and (iii), and substituted “legal resident” for “citizen” in clause (ii); and made minor stylistic changes throughout the section.

§ 47.1-5.
Application.

No person shall be commissioned as a notary public or electronic notary public pursuant to this title until he submits an application fee as set forth in §

2.2-409

and a complete and correct application to the Secretary of the Commonwealth, in a form prescribed by the Secretary, which shall include the oath of the applicant, signed and sworn before some officer authorized by law to administer oaths, that the answers to all questions on the application are true and complete to the best of his knowledge and that he is qualified to be appointed and commissioned as a notary public. The Secretary may accept applications by electronic means.

Any application fee shall be waived for an application filed by a clerk or deputy clerk of a circuit or district court.

History.

Code 1950, § 47-2; 1962, p. 687; 1976, c. 559; 1979, c. 14; 1980, c. 580; 2001, c. 488; 2002, c. 832; 2007, cc. 269, 590; 2008, cc. 117, 814.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 488 added “however, such fee shall be waived for an application filed by a clerk or deputy clerk of a general district court” at the end of subdivision 4.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 832 inserted “circuit or” in subdivision 4.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by cc. 269 and 590 are identical and rewrote the section.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 117 and 814 are identical, and in the first paragraph, inserted “or electronic notary public” near the beginning of the first sentence and added the second sentence; and deleted “general” preceding “district court” at the end of the second paragraph.

§ 47.1-5.1.
Application for recommission.

Persons already commissioned as notaries public or electronic notaries public pursuant to this title and who are submitting application for recommission as a notary or electronic notary may submit applications to the Secretary in person, by first-class mail, or online, provided online applications contain electronic signatures, authorized by the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (§ 59.1-479 et seq.), as confirmation that the application has been signed and sworn pursuant to §

47.1-5

.

History.

2011, cc. 123, 177; 2014, c. 703.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 703 substituted “Persons” for “For persons” at the beginning and substituted “may submit applications to the Secretary in person, by first-class mail, or online, provided online applications contain” for “the Secretary may accept.”

§ 47.1-6.
Reserved.

§ 47.1-6.1.
Standards for electronic notarization.

The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall develop standards for electronic notarization and the Virginia Information Technologies Agency shall provide assistance to the Secretary of the Commonwealth relating to the equipment, security, and technological aspects of the electronic notarization standards. The process for developing and maintaining such standards shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.

2009, c. 160.

Effective date.

This section became effective March 16, 2009.

§ 47.1-7.
Additional requirements for performing electronic notarial acts.

An applicant shall submit a registration form established by the Secretary for registering and being commissioned as an electronic notary public, which shall include:

The applicant’s full legal and official notary names;

A general description of the technology or technologies the registrant will use to create an electronic signature in performing official acts;

Certification of compliance to the Secretary of the Commonwealth with electronic notary standards developed in accordance with §

47.1-6.1

; and

The electronic mail address of the registrant.

The registration form shall (i) be signed by the applicant using the electronic signature described in the form; (ii) include any decrypting instructions, codes, keys, or software that allow the registration to be read; and (iii) be transmitted electronically to the Secretary.

Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent an electronic notary from using updated technology or technologies during the term of the commission; however, the electronic notary shall notify the Secretary electronically within 90 days of installation or use of such updated technology or technologies and provide a brief description thereof.

History.

2007, cc. 269, 590; 2009, c. 160; 2011, cc. 731, 834.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 269 and 590, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this Act relating to electronic notaries public and electronic notarization shall become effective July 1, 2008.”

Acts 2011, cc. 731 and 834, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act relating to the use of video and audio conference technology shall become effective July 1, 2012.” At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, amendments to §§

47.1-2

and

47.1-14

have been set out as effective July 1, 2012.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 160, effective March 16, 2009, added subdivision A 4; redesignated former subdivision A 4 as A 5 and made related changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 731 and 834 are identical, and inserted “general” in subdivision A 2; deleted subdivision A 3, which read: “If the device used to create the registrant’s electronic signature is issued or registered through a licensed authority, the name of that authority, the source of the license, the starting and expiration dates of the device’s term of registration, and any revocations, annulments, or other premature terminations of any registered device of the registrant that were due to misuse or compromise of the device, with the date, cause, and nature of each termination explained in detail”; and redesignated former subdivisions A 4 and A 5 as subdivisions A 3 and A 4.

§ 47.1-8.
Commission to be issued, etc.

Upon receipt of a completed application and the correct fee, the Secretary, if satisfied the applicant is qualified to be registered and commissioned as a notary public or electronic notary public, shall prepare a notary commission for the applicant which shall include a registration number and forward the commission for a notary public or electronic notary public to the clerk of the circuit court in which the applicant shall elect to qualify. The Secretary shall thereupon notify the applicant that the commission has been granted and where and how it may be secured. An electronic notary public may act as a notary public in all respects upon being commissioned as an electronic notary public.

History.

Code 1950, § 47-2; 1962, p. 687; 1976, c. 559; 1979, c. 14; 1980, c. 580; 2007, cc. 269, 590; 2008, cc. 117, 814.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 269 and 590, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this Act relating to electronic notaries public and electronic notarization shall become effective July 1, 2008.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 269 and 590 are identical, and substituted “to be registered” for “to be appointed” and inserted “which shall include a registration number” in the first sentence.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 269 and 590, effective July 1, 2008,
are identical, and inserted “or electronic notary public” in the first sentence and added the third sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 117 and 814 are identical, and deleted “proper endorsements” following “completed application” and inserted “for a notary public or electronic notary public” in the first sentence.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Authority of Secretary of Commonwealth regarding electronic notaries public. —

The Virginia Notary Act does not authorize the Secretary of the Commonwealth to prescribe equipment or technological requirements for electronic notaries public, to prescribe standards beyond that imposed by general law for third-party providers of electronic notary devices or technology, or to promulgate rules or regulations. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Katherine K. Hanley, Secretary of the Commonwealth, 08-022 (4/1/08).

§ 47.1-9.
Oath of notary; duties of clerks.

Before receiving his commission, each person appointed a notary shall appear before the clerk of the circuit court to which his commission has been sent, present sufficient satisfaction of evidence of identity as defined in §

47.1-2

, and make oath as follows:

“I,.
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . ., solemnly swear (or affirm) under penalty of perjury, that I have carefully read the notary laws of this Commonwealth, and am familiar with their provisions; that I will uphold the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution and laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia; and that I will faithfully perform, to the best of my ability, the duties of the office of notary public.”

Such oath shall be signed by the applicant and attested by the clerk. The clerk shall thereupon issue to the applicant his commission as notary public or electronic notary public. Within 14 days of such qualification, the clerk shall certify the fact of such qualification to the Secretary of the Commonwealth.

No person shall be permitted to qualify who does not appear before the clerk within 60 days of his appointment. The clerk of each circuit court shall, at least once each month, return to the Secretary all commissions which have not been claimed within such 60-day period, and the Secretary shall forthwith cancel the same.

History.

1980, c. 580; 2007, cc. 269, 590; 2008, cc. 117, 814; 2012, c. 566.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 269 and 590, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this Act relating to electronic notaries public and electronic notarization shall become effective July 1, 2008.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 269 and 590 are identical, and inserted “present sufficient satisfaction of evidence of identity as defined in §

47.1-2

” in the first paragraph, added the present second sentence of the third paragraph, made minor stylistic changes and a related change.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 269 and 590, effective July 1, 2008, are identical, and inserted “or electronic notary” in the first paragraph and at the end of the third sentence of the third paragraph.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 117 and 814 are identical, and deleted the former second sentence of the next-to-last paragraph, which read: “The clerk shall review and confirm that the notary has presented a statement signed by any clerk or deputy clerk of any general district court of this Commonwealth, or by any attorney for the Commonwealth or assistant attorney for the Commonwealth, or by the Attorney General or any of his assistants, or by any member of the General Assembly, that such official has examined the application and recommends the applicant for appointment.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 566 deleted “or electronic notary” following “appointed a notary” in the introductory paragraph and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 47.1-10.
Records of the Secretary.

The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall keep a record of the names of all notaries public and electronic notaries public and the dates of their registration and qualification. The Secretary shall also retain a specimen of the signature of each notary commissioned pursuant to this chapter. The specimen may be retained in photographic form.

The Secretary shall also be required to retain the completed applications of persons seeking appointment as notary public for a period of three months after their receipt; provided, however, that he shall retain the applications of persons refused appointment for not less than four years.

The Secretary may maintain these records in digital format.

History.

Code 1950, § 47-2; 1962, p. 687; 1976, c. 559; 1979, c. 14; 1980, c. 580; 2007, cc. 269, 590.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 269 and 590, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this Act relating to electronic notaries public and electronic notarization shall become effective July 1, 2008.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 269 and 590 are identical, and substituted “a record of the names” for “a book stating the names” and “of their registration” for “of their appointment” in the first sentence of the first paragraph, and added the third paragraph.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 269 and 590, effective July 1, 2008,
are identical, and inserted “and electronic notaries public” near the middle of the first sentence, and made a related change.

§ 47.1-11.
Reference materials.

The Secretary shall prepare, from time to time, reference materials for notaries public and electronic notaries public which shall contain the provisions of this title and such other information as the Secretary shall deem useful. Copies of the reference materials shall be made available to persons seeking appointment as notaries public and electronic notaries public as well as to other interested persons. The Secretary may make the materials available in digital format but shall provide written copies of the materials upon request.

History.

1980, c. 580; 2007, cc. 269, 590.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 269 and 590, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this Act relating to electronic notaries public and electronic notarization shall become effective July 1, 2008.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 269 and 590 are identical, and substituted “Reference materials” for “Handbook” in the section heading, “time, reference materials for” for “time, a handbook for” in the first sentence, and “reference materials” for “handbook” in the second sentence, and added the third sentence.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 269 and 590, effective July 1, 2008, are identical, and inserted “electronic notaries public” in the first sentence and “electronic notaries public as well as” in the second sentence.

§ 47.1-11.1.
Evidence of authenticity of electronic notarial act.

Form of evidence of authority of electronic notarial act. On a notarized electronic document transmitted to another state or country outside of the United States, electronic evidence of the authenticity of the official signature and seal of an electronic notary of the Commonwealth of Virginia, if required, shall be attached to or logically associated with the document and shall be in the form of an electronic certificate of authority signed by the Secretary that is independently verifiable, will be invalidated if the underlying document is improperly modified, and is in conformance with any current and pertinent international treaties, agreements, and conventions subscribed to by the government of the United States.

Certificate of authority for electronic notarial act. An electronic certificate of authority evidencing the authenticity of the official signature and seal of an electronic notary of the Commonwealth of Virginia shall contain substantially the following words:

Click to view

For issuing an electronic certificate of authority, the Secretary may charge a fee in an amount set by the Secretary.

Certificate of Authority for an Electronic Notarial Act I, (name and title), certify that (name of electronic notary), the person named as Electronic Notary Public in the attached or associated electronic document, was commissioned as an Electronic Notary Public for the Commonwealth of Virginia and authorized to act as such at the time of the document’s electronic notarization. To verify this Certificate of Authority for an Electronic Notarial Act, I have included herewith my electronic signature this day of , 20. (Electronic signature and seal of commissioning official)

History.

2007, cc. 269, 590.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 269 and 590, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this Act relating to electronic notaries public and electronic notarization shall become effective July 1, 2008.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 13-536 Counterparts; Receipt of Contract by Electronic Transmission; No. 16-484 Electronic Signatures; No. 16-1811 Certificate of Authority for Electronic Notarial Act.